Utah statutes.
63K-3-201.   Emergency Management Administration Council created -- Function
-- Composition -- Expenses.
(1)  There is created the Emergency Management Administration Council to
provide advice and coordination for state and local government agencies on
government emergency prevention, mitigation, preparedness, response, and
recovery actions and activities.
(2)  The council shall meet at the call of the chair, but at least quarterly.
(3)  The council shall be made up of the:
(a)  lieutenant governor, or the lieutenant governor's designee;
(b)  attorney general, or the attorney general's designee;
(c)  heads of the following state agencies, or their designees:
(i)  Department of Public Safety;
(ii)  Division of Homeland Security;
(iii)  Department of Transportation;
(iv)  Department of Health;
(v)  Department of Environmental Quality;
(vi)  Department of Community and Economic Development; and
(vii)  Department of Natural Resources;
(d)  adjutant general of the National Guard or the adjutant general's
designee;
(e)  commissioner of agriculture and food or the commissioner's designee;
(f)  two representatives with expertise in emergency management appointed by
the Utah League of Cities and Towns;
(g)  two representatives with expertise in emergency management appointed by
the Utah Association of Counties;
(h)  up to four additional members with expertise in homeland security,
critical infrastructure, or key resources as these terms are defined under 6
U.S. Code Section 101 appointed from the private sector, by the chair of the
council; and
(i)  two representatives appointed by the Utah Emergency Management
Association.
(4)  The commissioner of Public Safety and the lieutenant governor shall serve
as co-chairs of the council.
(5) (a)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the council at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(b)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
(6)  The council shall coordinate with existing emergency management related
entities including:
(a)  the Homeland Security Regional Committees established by the Department
of Public Safety;
(b)  the Statewide Mutual Aid Committee established under Section 53-2-503;
and
(c)  the Hazardous Chemical Emergency Response Commission designated under
Section 63K-3-301.
(7)  The council may establish other committees and task forces as determined
necessary by the council to carry out the duties of the council.
